test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_tabahtud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ruásmuttuu
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ruásmuttuvvus         # ruásmuttus
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ruásmuttuvvoon        # ruásmuttoon
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ruásmuttuvvee         # ruásmuttoo
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ruásmuttuvvus         # ruásmuttus
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ruásmuttuvvop         # ruásmuttup
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ruásmuttuđ            
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ruásmuttuvvus         # ruásmuttus
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruásmuttuu
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ruásmuttum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: ruásmuttuččii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ruásmuttužžii
    ruásmuttuđ+V+PrsPrc: ruásmuttuvvee
    ruásmuttuđ+V+PrfPrc: ruásmuttum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Nom: ruásmuttum
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Ess: ruásmuttuumin
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Loc: ruásmuttuumist
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Ill: ruásmuttuumân
    ruásmuttuđ+V+Actio+Com: ruásmuttuudijn
    ruásmuttuđ+V+VAbess: ruásmuttuuhánnáá

    lijkkuustuđ+V+Inf: lijkkuustuđ
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lijkkuustuum
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lijkkuustuvá
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lijkkuustuvveen
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lijkkuustuveh
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lijkkuustuu
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lijkkuustuvvim
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lijkkuustui
    lijkkuustuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lijkkuustuvvii
    
    huolâstuđ+V+Inf: huolâstuđ
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huolâstuum
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huolâstuvá
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: huolâstuvveen
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huolâstuveh
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: huolâstuu
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huolâstuvvim
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: huolâstui
    huolâstuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: huolâstuvvii
    
